Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Chapter 7. Prevention of Frauds and Perjuries

§ 181.
Agreements required to be written.

An action at law shall not be brought in the following cases unless the promise, contract, or agreement upon which such action is brought or some memorandum or note thereof is in writing, signed by the party to be charged therewith or by some person thereunto by him or her lawfully authorized:

A special promise of an executor or administrator to answer damages out of his or her own estate.

A special promise to answer for the debt, default, or misdoings of another.

An agreement made in consideration of civil marriage.

An agreement not to be performed within one year from the making thereof.

A contract for the sale of lands, tenements, or hereditaments, or of an interest in or concerning them. Authorization to execute such a contract on behalf of another shall be in writing.

An agreement to cure, a promise to cure, a contract to cure, or warranty of cure relating to medical care or treatment or the results of a service rendered by a health care professional which shall mean a person or corporation licensed by this State to provide health care or professional services as a physician, dentist, registered or licensed practical nurse, optometrist, podiatrist, chiropractor, physical therapist, or psychologist, or an officer, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.

An agreement to cure, a promise to cure, a contract to cure, or warranty of cure relating to medical care or treatment rendered by a health provider, which shall mean a corporation, facility, or institution licensed to provide health care as a hospital.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. March 29, 1972;

1975, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 7, 1976.

Part performance.

Marriage was not part performance of antenuptial agreement to pay his wife $5,000, and did not take it out of statute. Jones v. Williams, 94 Vt. 175, 109 A. 803, 1920 Vt. LEXIS 187 (1920).

Division line between lands.

Acquiescence in a wrong boundary line will not establish it as the true boundary unless the demands of the statute of frauds or adverse possession are met. Haklits v. Oldenburg, 124 Vt. 199, 201 A.2d 690, 1964 Vt. LEXIS 83 (1964).

An award or arbitrators in reference to division line between adjoining lands owned by different proprietors made on submission by parol had same effect as a parol agreement between the parties in reference to the same line would have, and was within statute. Smith v. Bullock, 16 Vt. 592, 1844 Vt. LEXIS 133 (1844).

Part performance.

To fall within the exception to the rule that a contract involving the sale of land or interests therein must be in writing, it was necessary for plaintiff to show that: (1) there was an oral agreement (2) upon which he reasonably relied (3) by changing his position so that he could not be returned to his former position, and (4) the other party knew of such reliance. Rappaport v. Estate of Banfield, 2007 VT 25, 181 Vt. 447, 924 A.2d 72, 2007 Vt. LEXIS 50 (2007).

Where plaintiff who had acquired a deeded right of first refusal to purchase a lot owned by defendants failed to show that there was a separate and distinct oral agreement regarding the right of first refusal, that he made a substantial and irretrievable change in position in reliance on the agreement, or that he fully performed any obligations under the alleged agreement, and the undisputed evidence, viewed in plaintiff’s favor, was that both plaintiff and defendants misunderstood the terms of plaintiff’s deed, the trial court properly found enforcement of plaintiff’s claimed oral agreement barred by the Statute of Frauds. Rappaport v. Estate of Banfield, 2007 VT 25, 181 Vt. 447, 924 A.2d 72, 2007 Vt. LEXIS 50 (2007).

Where there is an oral contract for the sale of land, a purchasing party who is in possession of the land and who makes substantial improvements to the property is entitled to specific performance of the agreement, and this may take the oral contract out of the Statute of Frauds. Quenneville v. Buttolph, 2003 VT 82, 175 Vt. 444, 833 A.2d 1263, 2003 Vt. LEXIS 268 (2003).

Money payments or actions that are indistinguishable from those of a tenant responsible for the maintenance of the leased premises are not sufficient to remove the agreement from the requirements in the Statute of Frauds. Quenneville v. Buttolph, 2003 VT 82, 175 Vt. 444, 833 A.2d 1263, 2003 Vt. LEXIS 268 (2003).

Where vendor and vendee entered into an oral purchase agreement which provided that upon payment of entire purchase price a deed conveying summer camp was to be given to vendee, and thereafter vendee made down payment and was given possession of premises by vendor, it could not be said that possession of this type of property coupled with a fractional payment of the purchase price was such part performance as would take the oral contract out of the Statute of Frauds, nor was there any proof or finding of the elements essential to the intervention of a court of equity. Troy v. Hanifin, 132 Vt. 76, 315 A.2d 875, 1974 Vt. LEXIS 303 (1974).

Where facts supported lower court’s determination that activities of proposed purchased under oral contract for sale of land, in making improvements on the premises, were entirely assignable to his situation as licensee, there was no part performance removing the contract from the Statute of Frauds. Bell v. Town of Grafton, 133 Vt. 1, 328 A.2d 408, 1974 Vt. LEXIS 274 (1974).

Validation of oral contract to convey real estate, in spite of prohibition against enforcement found in Statute of Frauds, depends on doctrine of part performance and since real issue is change of position by party claiming relief in reliance on the oral agreement to such a measure that parties cannot be restored to reasonable equivalence to their former condition, it is a requirement that reliance be something beyond injury adequately compensable in money. Jasmin v. Alberico, 135 Vt. 287, 376 A.2d 32, 1977 Vt. LEXIS 610 (1977).

Although oral contract to convey real estate may be taken out of Statute of Frauds by party in possession having made substantial improvements, such improvements to property as repairing back porch, having gas piped to house, making electrical and plumbing repairs, doing some landscaping and installing two stoves for heating purposes were indistinguishable from activities of a tenant responsible for maintenance of leased premises and simply did not meet the test of a substantial and irretrievable change of position set out in the case law. Jasmin v. Alberico, 135 Vt. 287, 376 A.2d 32, 1977 Vt. LEXIS 610 (1977).

Such performance under an oral contract as will make it a fraud to apply the prohibition of this section supports equitable relief and makes the contract enforceable; and party seeking enforcement of the contract need not show he has been defrauded, but rather, that his acts in reliance upon the agreement, known to the other party to the agreement, so altered the relations of the parties as to prevent restoration to their former condition. Nichols v. Nichols, 139 Vt. 273, 427 A.2d 374, 1981 Vt. LEXIS 451 (1981).

Where, for many years, son and his wife fully performed their part of oral contract whereby mother agreed to convey to them the family farm if, during the remainder of her life, they would operate the farm and care for her, there was such performance under the oral contract as would make it a fraud to apply the prohibition of this section. Nichols v. Nichols, 139 Vt. 273, 427 A.2d 374, 1981 Vt. LEXIS 451 (1981).

The fact that plaintiffs made financing arrangements and conducted a title search did not make the doctrine of part performance applicable in an action for specific performance of an alleged oral agreement for the sale of land where defendants sets up subdivision (5) of this section as a defense. Chomicky v. Buttolph, 147 Vt. 128, 513 A.2d 1174, 1986 Vt. LEXIS 375 (1986).

Money payments on the purchase are not enough to give an oral agreement enforceable status, even coupled with possession, in the face of this section. Chomicky v. Buttolph, 147 Vt. 128, 513 A.2d 1174, 1986 Vt. LEXIS 375 (1986).

Part performance of contract will never enable party to sustain action at law in direct violation of terms of statute. McGuirk v. Ward, 115 Vt. 221, 55 A.2d 610, 1947 Vt. LEXIS 105 (1947); Hibbard v. Whitney, 13 Vt. 21, 1841 Vt. LEXIS 3 (1841).

Under Statute of Frauds, where consideration itself is executory and touching land, mere execution of agreement on the other side is not sufficient to take the case out of statute. Theberge v. Canadian Pac. Ry., 119 Vt. 193, 122 A.2d 848, 1956 Vt. LEXIS 100 (1956).

Payment of purchase price by buyer is not by itself sufficient to remove case from statute. Carvage v. Stowell, 115 Vt. 187, 55 A.2d 188, 1947 Vt. LEXIS 98 (1947).

Where plaintiff had rendered services in part performance and consideration of parol contract for purchase of land, he could not rescind such contract and treat it as void and recover for said services unless defendant was unable or unwilling to proceed. Shaw v. Shaw, 6 Vt. 69, 1834 Vt. LEXIS 14 (1834).

Part performance as ground for relief in equity, see note 327.

§ 182.
Representations as to another.

An action shall not be brought to charge a person upon or by reason of a representation or assurance made concerning the character, conduct, credit, ability, trade, or dealings of another person, unless such representation or assurance is made in writing and signed by the party to be charged thereby, or by some person thereunto by him or her lawfully authorized.

§ 183.
Extension of time when there is a surety.

Where the performance of a contract is secured by the obligation of a surety, an agreement made between the creditor and the principal debtor for the extension of the time of payment, or the performance of the contract, shall not have any binding effect at law unless such agreement is made upon a valuable consideration and is in writing, or some note or memorandum thereof is in writing and signed by such creditor, or by some person thereunto duly authorized, reciting briefly the consideration upon which such contract is founded.

HISTORY:

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. March 29, 1972.